Oklahoma, session 2026, SB803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Parental


Rights Protection Act”.


B. The purpose of this act is to ensure that the rights of


parents, as outlined in the Parents’ Bill of Rights, are fully


protected and to establish clear consequences for any violation of


those rights by state agencies, officials, or individuals acting in


an official capacity.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2010 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 940 Page 1


The Parents’ Bill of Rights is hereby amended to include the


following provisions:


1. Right to Due Process: Parents have the right to be notified


in writing of any allegations or concerns regarding their parental


rights or the welfare of their child, with clear details of the


allegations, evidence, and specific actions required of the parent


to resolve the issues;


2. Right to Family Reunification: Parents shall have the right


to a fair and unbiased process for reunification with their child,


including a clearly defined and transparent timeline for


reunification, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of


immediate harm to the child. The Department of Human Services or


any state agency shall make all reasonable efforts to place children


with relatives or family members before placing them in foster care;


3. Right to Appeal: Parents have the right to appeal any


decisions related to the removal of their child or any actions that


limit their parental rights. Appeals shall be handled in a timely


manner and in accordance with due process;


4. Right to Access to Evidence: Parents have the right to


access all evidence, records, and reports used to make decisions


affecting their parental rights, including access to child welfare


records, medical reports, and other relevant documentation. The


Department of Human Services or any state agency shall not withhold


or redact evidence unless specifically authorized by law; and

Req. No. 940 Page 2


5. Right to Fair Investigation: Investigations regarding


allegations of child abuse or neglect shall be conducted fairly,


transparently, and in the best interest of the child, with all


parties (including both parents, guardians, and relevant


professionals) having the opportunity to present evidence,


testimonies, and challenge accusations.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2011 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any state agency or official including, but not limited to,


employees of the Department of Human Services, law enforcement, or


judicial officers found to have willfully violated the rights of


parents as enumerated in the Parents’ Bill of Rights, shall be


subject to the following consequences:


1. Monetary penalties: The violating agency or official shall


be subject to fines, with amounts determined based on the severity


of the violation, to be paid into a fund for the support and


reintegration of affected families;


2. Civil liability: The agency or official may be held liable


for damages caused to the affected parent or family, including


emotional distress, financial losses, and attorney’s fees. Parents


may file a civil lawsuit to seek redress for violations;


3. Suspension or removal from office: State officials who are


found to have knowingly violated the rights of parents or engaged in

Req. No. 940 Page 3


misconduct, including fraudulent reporting, failure to provide due


process, or retaliatory actions, may be subject to suspension or


removal from office, in accordance with applicable state laws and


procedures; or


4. Mandatory training and re-education: Any state employee


found to have violated the Parents’ Bill of Rights shall be required


to complete mandatory training on parental rights, due process, and


ethical conduct, before returning to their duties.


B. Judges or court officials who violate the rights of parents


by failing to follow due process or by making rulings without


sufficient evidence shall be subject to disciplinary action by the


Council on Judicial Complaints. This may include suspension,


removal, or other penalties as determined by the Council.


C. Any employee or official within a state agency who reports


violations of the Parents’ Bill of Rights, in good faith, shall be


protected from retaliation. Retaliatory actions, including


demotion, dismissal, or harassment, shall be subject to disciplinary


action.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2012 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A Parental Rights Review Board shall be established to monitor


compliance with the Parents’ Bill of Rights. The Board shall


consist of members appointed by the Governor to include legal

Req. No. 940 Page 4


experts, social workers, family advocates, and other relevant


stakeholders, and shall:


1. Review complaints submitted by parents and families


regarding violations of their rights;


2. Investigate claims of violations by state agencies or


officials;


3. Recommend actions, including disciplinary measures,


penalties, and reforms to improve the protection of parental rights;


and


4. Electronically submit an annual report to the Governor,


Legislature, and the public on the status of parental rights


protections in Oklahoma.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-940 DC 1/19/2025 5:43:38 AM











Req. No. 940 Page 5